apertium-cy-en.cy.dix.xml
    <pardef n="dyl/wn__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wn</l>
          <r>wn<s n="vaux"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>wn<s n="vaux"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>wn<s n="vaux"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>wn<s n="vaux"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>wn<s n="vaux"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ech</l>
          <r>wn<s n="vaux"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          <r>wn<s n="vaux"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aswn</l>
          <r>wn<s n="vaux"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asit</l>
          <r>wn<s n="vaux"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asai</l>
          <r>wn<s n="vaux"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asem</l>
          <r>wn<s n="vaux"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asech</l>
          <r>wn<s n="vaux"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asent</l>
          <r>wn<s n="vaux"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- NEW BOD PARADIGM -->

    <e lm="dylwn"><par n="initial-d"/><i>yl</i><par n="dyl/wn__vbmod"/></e>
